Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 28 Parking Facilities and Privileges

31-28-1.
“Parking meter” defined.

For the purpose of this chapter, “parking meter” means a meter device installed upon the public highways or the sidewalks adjacent to it, in which a coin must be deposited for the privilege of occupying, for a certain period, a space which is situated in a zone which a lawful authority has designated as a parking meter zone for the purpose of regulating parking of vehicles on public highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 897, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-1

.

31-28-2.
Ordinances authorizing parking meters and meter zones.

Any town or city council may enact ordinances authorizing the installation, operation, maintenance, policing, and supervision of parking meters on the public highways, and fix and provide for the payment of a fee for the purpose of parking by requiring the operator of any vehicle parking in the zone to deposit in the meter in the zone or adjacent to it, a coin of the United States as the council shall determine to be necessary for the purpose of regulating parking. Any fee established for parking shall bear a reasonable relation to the actual cost incurred by the town or city in the installation, operation, maintenance, policing, and supervision of the parking meter system and the parking of motor vehicles on the public highways.

The commissioner of public safety for the city of Providence and the council of any other city or town may establish parking meter zones for the purpose of regulating the parking of motor vehicles on the public highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 897, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2723, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-2

; P.L. 1987, ch. 215, § 1.

31-28-3.
Unauthorized meters.

It shall be unlawful to install or operate parking meters in any town or city in this state until the qualified electors of the city or town have had submitted to them for their approval or rejection the question of the installation of parking meters, and have signified their approval of the question, and until any town or city council shall enact ordinances or regulations governing the installation and operation of the parking meters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 897, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-3

.

31-28-4.
Exemption of persons with disabilities from payment of fees.

No city or town or any agency of a city or town shall exact any fee for parking on the public highways or in any metered parking space from any person who has been issued a disability parking privilege placard or sticker pursuant to §

31-28-7

,

31-28-7

.1 or

31-29-5

, nor from the owner of the motor vehicle transporting the person with a disability, provided that upon which vehicle there is displayed any disability parking placard or sticker that shall be issued by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2051, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2879, § 2; P.L. 1953, ch. 3199, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-4

; P.L. 1976, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 72; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 72.

31-28-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2051, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2879, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-5

; P.L. 1967, ch. 66, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1982, ch. 281, § 1.

31-28-6.
Overtime parking by persons with a disability exempt from fees.

No penalty shall be imposed upon any person with a disability issued a disability parking privilege placard or sticker pursuant to §

31-28-7

, 31-27-7.1 or

31-29-5

, nor from the motor vehicle transporting the person with a disability, provided that upon that vehicle there is displayed a disability parking placard or sticker for parking on the highways or in a space for a longer period of time than other persons are permitted to park on the highways or in a space. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize that person to park in any place at any time where parking is prohibited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2051, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-6

; P.L. 1982, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 72; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 72.

31-28-7.
Motor vehicle plates for persons with disabilities — Entitlement — Designated parking spaces — Violations.

Persons, as defined in subsection (h) of this section, upon application and proof of permanent or long-term disability to the division of motor vehicles, shall be issued one motor vehicle disability parking privilege placard or in the case of a motorcycle, one motor vehicle sticker, of blue which shall be imprinted with the white international symbol of access, certificate number, the words “Rhode Island Disability Parking Permit” and shall bear the expiration date upon its face. A placard or motorcycle sticker issued to a person whose disability is temporary shall be substantially similar to that issued to a person with a permanent or long term disability. The temporary placard, however, shall be a red placard with a white international symbol of access, certificate number, the words “Rhode Island Disability Parking Permit” and shall bear the expiration dates upon its face. A preliminary placard shall be similar to that issued to a person with a permanent, long-term, or temporary disability. The preliminary placard shall be effective for twenty-one (21) days, and may be issued by an applicant’s licensed physician, if in the medical provider’s opinion the applicant’s medical condition merits the issuance of a preliminary placard while the division considers the applicant’s qualifications for any type of disability parking permit. The preliminary placard shall be an orange placard with a white international symbol of access, certificate number, the words “Rhode Island Disability Parking Permit” and shall bear the expiration date upon its face and shall be displayed on the dashboard of the vehicle in a manner that it is clearly visible from the front. The division of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules governing the issuance and use of preliminary placards. Applicants shall not be charged any fee associated with the issuance of a preliminary placard. Physicians submitting false information to the division of motor vehicles to obtain a preliminary placard on anyone’s behalf may be subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-18-1.3

. Persons issued a placard or motorcycle sticker pursuant to this section shall be entitled to the immunities of §§

31-28-4

and

31-28-6

. The placard shall conform to the Uniform Parking System for Disabled Drivers standard issued by the United States Department of Transportation. If an application for a placard or motorcycle sticker is denied, the division of motor vehicles shall promptly notify the applicant in writing, stating the specific reason(s) for the denial, and advising the applicant of the procedures for requesting a hearing to appeal the denial. Prior to the appeal hearing, the applicant shall be provided with any and all documents relied upon by the division in denying the application. If an application contains a physician certification that the applicant is sufficiently disabled to require a placard or motorcycle sticker, and the division has not provided specific reasons in its denial letter to the applicant, the hearing officer shall summarily order that a placard or motorcycle sticker be provided to the applicant. At all other hearings of application denials where a physician certification has been provided, the division shall bear the burden of proof that the individual is not entitled to a placard or motorcycle sticker pursuant to this chapter.

A placard issued pursuant to this section shall be portable and used only when the person is being transported. The placard is to be hung from the rear view mirror so as to be seen through the front or rear windshield of the motor vehicle. A placard may be issued to a person with a disability who does not own a motor vehicle, to be used only when he or she is being transported. A motorcycle sticker issued pursuant to this section shall not be portable and shall be affixed to the rear plate of the motorcycle.

The certificate of entitlement to the placard or motorcycle sticker shall be renewed every six (6) years for individuals with a long-term disability, as defined in subsection (d) of this section, and the renewal application shall require a physician’s certification that the condition has not changed since the previous approval, and six (6) years for individuals with a permanent disability as defined in subsection (h) of this section, in accordance with a schedule prepared by the division of motor vehicles that uses the last name of an individual to determine the month of renewal. If an application or subsequent renewal is accompanied by a physician’s certification that the applicant’s condition is a chronic, permanent impairment and that application is approved, then any subsequent renewal shall be authorized upon receipt of a notarized affidavit from the applicant or applicant’s, guardian or legal representative or a certificate from the applicant’s physician that his or her condition has not changed since the previous approval.

The certificate of entitlement to the placard or motorcycle sticker shall be covered with plastic or similar material. The applicant shall, upon timely renewal, receive a sticker bearing the expiration date of the certificate of entitlement to be affixed across the expiration date of the disability parking privilege placard or in the case of a motorcycle the applicant shall receive a new motorcycle sticker. The division of motor vehicles shall establish rules and regulations allowing for the renewal of the certificates of entitlement by mail.

Whenever the division of motor vehicles proposes to suspend, revoke or fail to renew the certificate of entitlement for noncompliance with the requirements of this section or for violation of subsection (h) of this section, the individual shall first be entitled to a hearing before the division of motor vehicles to contest the proposed action. At the hearing, the division of motor vehicles shall bear the burden of proof that the individual is not entitled to the placard or motorcycle sticker pursuant to this chapter. There shall be no renewal fee charged for the placards or motorcycle sticker. The division of motor vehicles shall be authorized to issue a temporary disability parking privilege placard or motorcycle sticker immediately upon receipt of an application for individuals with a temporary impairment, as defined in subsection (h) of this section. A temporary placard or motorcycle sticker shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date of issuance. Temporary placards or motorcycle stickers may be renewed for a period of one year or less, as determined by the medical advisory board upon application if the disability persists. The division of motor vehicles shall subsequently review the applications in accordance with the procedures currently in effect as to applications from persons whose disability is long term. Any issuance which, after subsequent review, shall be found to be inappropriate shall be revoked and notice of the revocation shall be sent to the applicant.

A person, other than a person with a disability, who for his or her own purposes uses the parking privilege placard, shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. A person issued a special placard who uses the placard after expiration, or who shall allow unauthorized use of the disability parking placard or sticker, may be subject to immediate revocation of the use of the placard by the division of motor vehicles, and subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

Disability parking spaces shall be designated and identified by the posting of signs above ground level incorporating the international symbol of access of white on blue, and the words “Handicapped Parking,” “Disability Parking,” “Disabled Parking,” or “Reserved Parking” at each space, at both ends of a row or series of adjacent disability parking spaces, or at the entrance to a parking lot restricted to only disability parking.

A person, other than a person issued a special placard or motorcycle sticker pursuant to this section, who parks a vehicle in a parking space designated for persons with disabilities, shall be fined: (1) one hundred dollars ($100) for a first violation, (2) one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) for a second violation, and (3) three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325) for a third or subsequent violation. The vehicle may be subject to towing at the owner’s expense. Provided further, that it shall not be unlawful for a person to park a vehicle in a space designated for person with disabilities if that person is transporting a person who has been issued a special placard and is properly displaying the placard on the vehicle.

Enforcement of the parking provisions of this section shall be enforced by the local or state authorities on public or private property when the location of the parking spaces is within the purview of the State Building Code, chapter 27.3 of title 23.

Definitions. For the purpose of this section:

“Disabled” or “disability” means a permanent or long-term impairment which prevents or impedes walking, which shall include but not be limited to: (i) an impairment which prevents walking and requires use of a wheelchair; (ii) an impairment which involuntarily causes difficulty or insecurity in walking or climbing stairs with or without the need to use braces, crutches, canes or artificial support; (iii) an impairment caused by amputation, arthritis, blindness (including legally blind), or orthopedic condition; (iv) an impairment in respiratory, circulatory, or neurological health which limits the person’s walking capability; or (v) disabled veteran, pursuant to §

31-6-8

after certification of eligibility from the Veterans’ Administration or other satisfactory documentation of eligibility is presented. Persons with disabilities may be capable of working or may be presently working.

“Long-term disability” means an impairment which is potentially reversible or may improve with appropriate medical treatment. At the time of application and or renewal, the impairment should not be expected to improve prior to the expiration of the certification, to a point where the individual does not meet the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.

“Permanent disability” means an impairment which is non-reversible.

“Temporary impairment” means an impairment which is expected to improve to a point where the individual does not meet the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, within two (2) years of the application.

The department of revenue shall inform each licensed driver of the certificate procedures and parking restrictions of this section and §§

31-28-4

and

31-28-6

, and a facsimile of the portable placards and motorcycle stickers issued under this section shall be sent to the enforcing authority of each state, and each enforcing authority shall be informed of the parking restrictions of this section and §§

31-28-4

and

31-28-6

. Recipients of disability parking privilege placards shall also receive instructions on their use and the penalties for misuse, when the placard is initially issued.

Any person who makes, manufactures, offers for sale or knowingly uses a counterfeit parking privilege placard shall be fined up to five hundred dollars ($500) and/or forty (40) hours of community restitution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2051, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2851, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3575, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-7

; P.L. 1982, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 281, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 592, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 548, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 72; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 72; P.L. 2000, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 7; P.L. 2002, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 651, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 23; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 23; P.L. 2013, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 115, § 1.

31-28-7.1.
Motor vehicle placards for group care facilities, government agencies, nonprofit organizations, or companies serving people with disabilities.

Upon application to the division of motor vehicles, any group care facility, government agency, non-profit organizations, or company that provides services to persons with disabilities shall be issued one or more portable motor vehicle placards as described in §

31-28-7(a)

and (b).

The applicant shall provide to the division of motor vehicles proof that the applicant is a bona fide group care facility, government agency, non-profit organization or company providing services to persons with disabilities as defined in §

31-28-7(h)

.

The division of motor vehicles shall not issue more than ten (10) placards to any one facility. The number of placards to be issued shall be determined by the division of motor vehicles based upon the number of persons served by the facility and the frequency with which the staff of the facility must transport the clients or patients of the facility.

The placards shall be used only by agents or employees of the facility and only when transporting persons with disabilities who are clients or patients of the facility. The placard is to be hung from the rear view mirror as to be seen through the front and rear windshield of the motor vehicle.

A person other than an agent or employee of the facility to which the placard was issued, or an agent or employee of the facility not engaged in transporting clients or patients of the facility, who uses the parking privilege placards for his or her own purposes, shall be fined one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125) for each violation. A facility that allows the unauthorized use of the placards may be subject to revocation of the use of the placard by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 72; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 72; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 56.

31-28-7.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 135, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 314, § 2; and P.L. 1996, ch. 323, § 2, effective August 8, 1996.

31-28-7.3.
Disability parking enforcement program.

The state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the state operated colleges shall establish a disability parking enforcement enhancement programs no later than January 1, 2000. The program will be designed to improve enforcement of disability parking laws on state-owned property and in parking facilities serving space leased or owned by the state, including state departments, agencies, boards, commissions, and quasi-governmental corporations. Citations issued in conjunction with this program shall be submitted to the traffic tribunal or its successor entity for collection pursuant to §§

31-28-7

and

31-28-7

.1 and the fines collected through shall be paid over to the state agency or college that issued the citation.

The several cities and towns shall establish disability parking enforcement enhancement programs. Citations issued in conjunction with local enforcement programs shall be submitted to the municipal court, where established, or to the traffic tribunal or its successor entity. Fines collected through citations issued in accordance with local enforcement program specifications shall be paid over to the city or town or pursuant to §§

31-28-7

and

31-28-7

.1.

Disability parking enforcement enhancement plans.

The state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the state operated colleges shall submit a disability parking enforcement enhancement plan to the governor’s commission on disabilities.

Cities and towns shall submit a disability parking enforcement enhancement plan to the governor’s commission on the disability.

The disability parking enforcement enhancement plans shall describe the enforcement program which the state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the state operated colleges or the municipality intends to establish.

The disability parking enforcement enhancement plan shall be reviewed by governor’s commission on disabilities within sixty (60) days of receipt and suggest improvements to the disability parking enforcement enhancement plans, that shall not be construed as required amendments.

The types of disability parking enforcement enhancement programs which may be put in place in each municipality, and by the state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the state operated colleges, may include, but shall not be limited to:

Enforcement programs which utilize persons deputized for the purpose of the disability parking enforcement enhancement program. The disability parking enforcement deputies shall be required to complete a minimum of four (4) hours training in parking enforcement before being assigned to the program. Each municipality and the state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the state operated colleges shall provide adequate training and shall assume all liability associated with disability parking enforcement.

Enforcement programs which specifically designate paid and trained personnel as staff for the disability parking enforcement enhancement program. These personnel are not limited to on-duty police officers, but may also include officers to be paid overtime, auxiliary personnel, special forces, retired personnel, and other paid employee deemed by the responsible authority to be competent and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 41; P.L. 2011, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 235, § 1.

31-28-7.10.
Special legislative commission to study the disability parking placard system.

A special legislative commission is hereby created consisting of seven (7) members: two (2) of whom shall be from the house of representatives, not more than one from the same political party to be appointed by the speaker; two (2) of whom shall be from the senate, not more than one from the same political party to be appointed by the senate majority leader; one of whom shall be a representative of the division of motor vehicles, to be appointed by the registrar; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the governor’s commission on disabilities, appointed by the chairperson of the governor’s commission on disabilities. In lieu of any appointment of a member of the legislation to a permanent advisory commission, a legislative study commission, or any commission created by a general assembly resolution, the appointing authority may appoint a member of the general public to serve in lieu of a legislator, provided that the majority leader or the minority leader of the political party which is entitled to the appointment consents to the appointment of the member of the general public.

The purpose of the commission shall be to study the disability parking placard system and recommend possible changes to the system and thereby improve service. The members of the commission shall meet at the call of the speaker of the house and organize and shall select from among the legislators a chairperson. Vacancies in the commission shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment.

The membership of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents that is deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this section.

The speaker of the house is hereby authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for the commission. The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the general assembly on or before January 24, 2003 and the commission shall expire on March 24, 2003.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 214, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 396, § 2.

31-28-8.
Use of meters for charitable contributions.

During the period when any annual national “march of dimes” campaign is taking place for infantile paralysis, any city or town in this state, in which parking meters have been established by authority of law, is authorized to permit the inserting of dimes into any of the parking meters by pedestrians or motorists, the dimes to be collected and turned over to the respective committee in charge of the collection of dimes for the specific “march of dimes” campaign to be used for those purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2162, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-28-8

.

31-28-9.
Owner’s liability for parking tickets.

Whenever any motor vehicle shall be parked illegally, the owner of the motor vehicle shall be jointly and individually liable with the operator for the payment of any fines imposed unless the owner of the vehicle has prima facie proof that the vehicle was parked illegally by another person who is not an employee of the owner. Any district court or municipal court citation for a nonmoving violation shall be deemed admitted and defaulted after two (2) notices unanswered by the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 539, § 1.

31-28-10.
Parking spaces for persons transporting young children and strollers.

Motor vehicle parking spaces specifically designed for persons transporting young children under the age of three (3) years and baby strollers, shall be required for all parking lots other than lots for single-family, duplex, townhouse, or multifamily residences; provided, however, industrial-zoned properties shall not be required to comply with this section. The motor vehicle parking spaces specifically designed for persons transporting young children under the age of three (3) years and baby strollers shall be provided as follows:

Motor vehicle parking spaces specifically designed for persons transporting young children under the age of three (3) years and baby strollers shall be located as closely as possible to parking spaces designated for the physically handicapped and/or disabled persons; provided, however, parking spaces designated for the physically handicapped and/or disabled persons shall take precedence. Where no parking spaces designated for the physically handicapped and/or disabled persons have been provided, parking spaces for persons transporting young children in baby strollers shall be located on the shortest accessible route of travel from adjacent parking to an accessible entrance.

All parking spaces for persons transporting young children and strollers shall be prominently outlined with green paint and posted with an approved permanent above-ground sign which shall be of a minimum size of twelve inches (12") wide and eighteen inches (18") in height and shall include an image of a baby stroller with the language “Reserved Parking” located above the image of the baby stroller and with the language “persons with strollers” located below the baby stroller image. The bottom of the sign must be at least five feet (5´) above grade when attached to a building, or seven feet (7´) above grade for a detached sign.

All property owners required by this section to provide motor vehicle parking spaces for persons transporting young children and strollers shall provide such parking spaces within two (2) years from June 28, 2022. In no event shall the number of parking spaces for the physically handicapped and/or disabled be reduced below the quantity otherwise required by law.

Enforcement of the parking provisions of this section shall be enforced by the local or state authorities on public or private property when the location of the parking spaces is within the purview of the state building code, chapter 27.3 of title 23.

The owners of said property shall be responsible for the cost of the signage and proper installation in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

Total Parking Required Number Spaces in Lot of Stroller Spaces Up to 100 0 101 to 500 2 501 to 1,000 3 >1,001 One additional space for each 500 parking spaces over 1,000

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 239, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 240, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.